Utah statutes.
53A-29-104.   Internship programs -- Criminal background checks.

Officers and employees of a cooperating employer who will be given significant unsupervised access to a student in connection with the student's activities as an intern shall be considered to be volunteer school workers solely for purposes of criminal background checks under Section 53A-3-410.



Enacted by Chapter 73, 1996 General Session

